Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.040

Approval of applications for federal community development block grant funds for projects.

Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the director is authorized to approve applications of local governments for federal community development block grant funds which the local governments would use to make loans to finance business projects within their jurisdictions. Applications approved by the director under this chapter shall conform to applicable federal requirements.

[ 2005 c 136 s 4; 1987 c 461 s 3; 1985 c 164 s 4.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—2005 c 136: See notes following RCW 43.168.020.